District of Columbia statutes.
48-851.03

Disposal of pharmaceuticals by health care facilities.

(a)

Effective January 1, 2011, it shall be unlawful for a health care facility to dispose of any pharmaceutical product, used or unused, by flushing the product down a drain or by any other method that utilizes the public sewer system, except as authorized by the Mayor through rulemaking.

(b)

A health care facility that is determined to have disposed of a pharmaceutical product in a manner prohibited by this chapter or by rules issued pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to a civil fine of up to $1,000 per occurrence and required to submit to the Board of Pharmacy a mitigation plan designed to prevent further occurrences.

Mar. 5, 2010, D.C. Law 18-112, § 4, 56 DCR 9378
This section is referenced in § 48-851.04.